Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 2. Escrow Funds Contributed to Commonwealth.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Escrow, § 1.

§ 3.2-4202.
Assignment to the Commonwealth of rights to tobacco manufacturer escrow funds; contribution to the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of §

3.2-4201

, a tobacco product manufacturer who elects to place funds into escrow pursuant to subdivision A 2 of §

3.2-4201

may make an irrevocable assignment of its interest in the funds to the benefit of the Commonwealth. Such assignment shall be permanent and shall apply to all funds in the subject escrow account at the time of assignment or that may subsequently come into such account, including those deposited into the escrow account prior to the assignment being executed, those deposited into the escrow account after the assignment is executed, and interest or other appreciation on such funds. Any interest or other appreciation withdrawn from the subject escrow account prior to the time of assignment shall not be a part of the assignment. The tobacco product manufacturer, the Attorney General, and the financial institution where the escrow account is maintained shall make such amendments to the qualified escrow account agreement, title to the account, and the account itself as may be necessary to effectuate an irrevocable assignment of rights executed pursuant to this section or a withdrawal or payment of funds from the escrow account pursuant to §

3.2-4203

. An assignment of rights executed pursuant to this section shall be in writing, signed by a duly authorized representative of the tobacco product manufacturer making the assignment, and shall become effective upon delivery of the assignment to the Attorney General and the financial institution where the escrow account is maintained.

History.

2005, cc. 899, 901, § 3.1-336.2:1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4203.
Withdrawal of escrow funds assigned and contributed to the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of §

3.2-4201

, any escrow funds assigned and contributed to the Commonwealth pursuant to §

3.2-4202

shall be withdrawn by the Commonwealth by request of the State Treasurer to the Attorney General and upon approval of the Attorney General. The State Treasurer shall make such request as soon as practicable and such escrow funds withdrawn shall be deposited into the Virginia Health Care Fund established under §

32.1-366

.

After such withdrawal, any remaining escrow funds shall be withdrawn under the withdrawal procedures provided in this section, and the withdrawn escrow funds shall be deposited into the Virginia Health Care Fund. Nothing in this article shall be construed to relieve a tobacco product manufacturer from any past, current, or future obligations it may have pursuant to Article 1 (§

3.2-4200

et seq.) or 3 (§

3.2-4204

et seq.).

History.

2005, cc. 899, 901, § 3.1-336.2:2; 2008, c. 860; 2016, c. 305.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 305, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall in no way alter or affect any (i) tax credit or tax benefit or other tax attribute allowed or earned under any section repealed by this act or (ii) tax liability or obligation pursuant to any such section.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 305 deleted “less the aggregate limitation for incentive payments to all small tobacco product manufacturers for the relevant year due from the escrow funds pursuant to § 58.1-439.15:01” at the end of the first sentence and deleted “and after the actual incentive payments pursuant to § 58.1-439.15:01 have been made from the escrow funds in the escrow account” following “After such withdrawal” and substituted “3 (§

3.2-4204

et seq.)” for “Article 3 (§

3.2-4204

et seq.) of this chapter” in the second paragraph.